Nevada, session 83, AB383-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 449A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 7, inclusive,
of this act.
Sec. 2. Sections 2 to 7, inclusive, of this act may be cited as
the Right to Reproductive Health Care Act.
Sec. 3. As used in sections 2 to 7, inclusive, of this act, unless
the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in
-
*AB383_R2*

– 3 –
sections 4, 5 and 5.5 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 4. “Governmental entity” means the State of Nevada or
any of its agencies or political subdivisions.
Sec. 5. “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 5.5. “Reproductive health services” means medical,
surgical, counseling or referral services relating to the human
reproductive system, including, without limitation, services
relating to pregnancy, contraception, miscarriage, in-vitro
fertilization or any procedure or care found by a competent
medical professional to be appropriate based upon the wishes of a
patient and in accordance with the laws of this State.
Sec. 6. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
the provisions of sections 2 to 7, inclusive, of this act apply to all
state and local laws and ordinances and the implementation of
those laws and ordinances, whether statutory or otherwise, and
whether enacted before, on or after January 1, 2024. The
provisions of sections 2 to 7, inclusive, of this act do not apply to
NRS 442.250 or the implementation of NRS 442.250.
2. State laws that are enacted on or after January 1, 2024, are
subject to the provisions of sections 2 to 7, inclusive, of this act
unless the law explicitly excludes such application by reference to
this section.
3. The provisions of sections 2 to 7, inclusive, of this act do
not:
(a) Authorize a governmental entity to burden:
(1) The access of any person to reproductive health
services, information related to reproductive health services or any
drug or device related to reproductive health services; or
(2) The ability of a provider of health care to provide
reproductive health services or information related to reproductive
health services or to provide, administer, dispense or prescribe any
drug or device related to reproductive health services within the
scope of practice, training and experience of the provider of health
care.
(b) Authorize or sanction any sterilization procedure without
the voluntary and informed consent of the patient.
Sec. 7. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
governmental entity shall not enact or implement any limitation or
requirement that:
(a) Expressly, effectively, implicitly or, as implemented, singles
out reproductive health services, drugs or devices related to
reproductive health services or information related to reproductive
health services or any providers of health care or facilities that
-
*AB383_R2*

– 4 –
provide reproductive health services, drugs or devices related to
reproductive health services or information related to reproductive
health services; and
(b) Substantially burdens:
(1) The access of a person to reproductive health services,
drugs or devices related to reproductive health services or
information related to reproductive health services; or
(2) The ability of a provider of health care to provide
reproductive health services, drugs or devices related to
reproductive health services or information related to reproductive
health services within the scope of practice, training and
experience of the provider of health care.
2. A governmental entity may enact a requirement or
limitation described in subsection 1 if the governmental entity
demonstrates by clear and convincing evidence that the burden
imposed by the requirement or limitation on the activity described
in paragraph (b) of subsection 1, as applied to the person or
provider of health care who is subject to the burden:
(a) Furthers a compelling interest; and
(b) Is the least restrictive means of furthering that interest.
3. Notwithstanding any provision of NRS 41.0305 to 41.039,
inclusive, but subject to the limitation on damages set forth in
NRS 41.035 when applicable, a person or provider of health care
who has been substantially burdened in violation of this section
may assert that violation as a claim or defense in a judicial
proceeding and obtain appropriate relief. A court shall award
costs and attorney’s fees to a person who prevails on such a claim
or defense pursuant to this section.
4. A court may find that a person is a vexatious litigant if the
person makes a claim within the scope of sections 2 to 7, inclusive,
of this act which is without merit, fraudulent or otherwise
intended to harass or annoy a person. If a court finds that a
person is a vexatious litigant pursuant to this subsection, the court
may deny standing to that person to bring further claims which
allege a violation of this section.
Sec. 8. NRS 422.27172 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.27172 1. The Director shall include in the State Plan for
Medicaid a requirement that the State pay the nonfederal share of
expenditures incurred for:
(a) Up to a 12-month supply, per prescription, of any type of
drug for contraception or its therapeutic equivalent which is:
(1) Lawfully prescribed or ordered;
(2) Approved by the Food and Drug Administration; and
(3) Dispensed in accordance with NRS 639.28075;
-
*AB383_R2*

– 5 –
(b) Any type of device for contraception which is lawfully
prescribed or ordered and which has been approved by the Food and
Drug Administration;
(c) Self-administered hormonal contraceptives dispensed by a
pharmacist pursuant to NRS 639.28078;
(d) Insertion or removal of a device for contraception;
(e) Education and counseling relating to the initiation of the use
of contraceptives and any necessary follow-up after initiating such
use;
(f) Management of side effects relating to contraception; [and]
(g) Voluntary sterilization [for women.] ; and
(h) Any clinical services relating to the drugs, devices and
services described in paragraphs (a) to (g), inclusive. Such clinical
services, include, without limitation, services to monitor the use
and effectiveness of contraception.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 4 and 5, to
obtain any benefit provided in the Plan pursuant to subsection 1, a
person enrolled in Medicaid must not be required to:
(a) Pay a higher deductible, any copayment or coinsurance; or
(b) Be subject to a longer waiting period or any other condition.
3. The Director shall ensure that the provisions of this section
are carried out in a manner which complies with the requirements
established by the Drug Use Review Board and set forth in the list
of preferred prescription drugs established by the Department
pursuant to NRS 422.4025.
4. The Plan may require a person enrolled in Medicaid to pay a
higher deductible, copayment or coinsurance for a drug for
contraception if the person refuses to accept a therapeutic equivalent
of the contraceptive drug.
5. For each method of contraception which is approved by the
Food and Drug Administration, the Plan must include at least one
contraceptive drug or device for which no deductible, copayment or
coinsurance may be charged to the person enrolled in Medicaid, but
the Plan may charge a deductible, copayment or coinsurance for any
other contraceptive drug or device that provides the same method of
contraception.
6. The Plan must:
(a) Provide for the reimbursement of a provider of health care
for providing services described in subsection 1 if the services are
within the scope of practice, training and experience of the
provider of health care.
(b) Provide coverage for the services described in subsection 1
regardless of whether those services are provided in an inpatient
or outpatient setting.
-
*AB383_R2*

– 6 –
7. The Director shall include in the State Plan for Medicaid a
requirement that the State pay the nonfederal share of
expenditures incurred for the costs of any language translation
services provided to facilitate the provision of any drug, device or
service described in subsection 1. The Division shall develop a
methodology establishing a rate of compensation for such
translation services that is cost effective and comparable to the
rate paid for translation services by other governmental entities
that arrange for the provision of such services.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Drug Use Review Board” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 422.402.
(b) “Therapeutic equivalent” means a drug which:
(1) Contains an identical amount of the same active
ingredients in the same dosage and method of administration as
another drug;
(2) Is expected to have the same clinical effect when
administered to a patient pursuant to a prescription or order as
another drug; and
(3) Meets any other criteria required by the Food and Drug
Administration for classification as a therapeutic equivalent.
Sec. 9. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 12. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 13. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 14. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 15. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 16. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 17. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 18. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 19. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 20. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 20.5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Division of Health Care Financing and Policy
of the Department of Health and Human Services for costs of
providing Medicaid coverage for translation services, changes to the
Medicaid Management Information System and manual claim
pricing associated with implementing the provisions of this act the
following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2023-2024 .................................... $15,102
For the Fiscal Year 2024-2025 .................................... $23,449
2. Expenditure of the following sums not appropriated from the
State General Fund or State Highway Fund is hereby authorized by
the Division of Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department
-
*AB383_R2*

– 7 –
of Health and Human Services for the same purpose as set forth in
subsection 1:
For the Fiscal Year 2023-2024 .................................... $47,753
For the Fiscal Year 2024-2025 .................................... $72,073
3. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 20, 2024, and September 19, 2025, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 20, 2024, and September 19, 2025, respectively.
Sec. 21. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Section 20.5 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2023.
3. Sections 1 to 20, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2024, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB383_R2*